Hawaii, session 2026, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State has a goal to achieve a one hundred per cent renewable portfolio standard by 2045.  The legislature recognizes that the Internal Revenue Service offers a clean electricity investment tax credit that provides incentives to support qualified renewable energy facilities that utilize labor paid at prevailing wages.  These incentives further support a clean energy economy by improving job quality in clean energy industries and expanding workforce training pathways into these jobs.  The legislature notes that Hawaii, unlike other states, does not provide any tax incentives for large-scale renewable energy facilities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to help the State achieve its clean energy goals by authorizing the public utilities commission to establish preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy from facilities that meet certain prevailing wage requirements. SECTION 2.  Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§269-    Preferential renewable energy rates; prevailing wages.  (a)  The public utilities commission may authorize preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy produced from facilities in conjunction with prevailing wages. (b) Upon receipt of a bona fide request for preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy produced from facilities in conjunction with prevailing wages, a public utility shall forward the request to the public utilities commission for approval. (c) As used in this section, "prevailing wages" has the same meaning as defined in section 104-1." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the public utilities commission special fund the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for any costs incurred by the public utilities commission in authorizing preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy pursuant to section 269-  , Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the public utilities commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________